South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The imposition of the user fee on gasoline and diesel fuel pursuant to Section 12-28-310, and the imposition of the road tax pursuant to Section 56-11-410 are suspended for thirty days from the effective date of this joint resolution. Upon the conclusion of thirty days, the impositions are reinstated at the rates set by law. SECTION 2.  The suspension contained in SECTION 1 must be automatically extended for an additional thirty days if, at the end of the initial suspension period imposed pursuant to SECTION 1, the average price of gasoline in South Carolina has not fallen by fifteen percent from the base price as established pursuant to this act. SECTION 3.  The Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office shall determine the average price for a gallon of gasoline in this State on the effective date of this act. The average price per gallon, as determined by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office pursuant to this SECTION, shall constitute the base price for the purposes of the automatic extension provided for in SECTION 2. The Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office shall publish the base price for gasoline in a conspicuous place on its website. SECTION 4.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----